Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.106

Native education public-private partnership account.

The Native education public-private partnership account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the activities of the office of Native education within the office of the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.105. Receipts from any appropriations made by the legislature for the purposes of RCW 28A.300.105, federal funds, gifts or grants from the private sector or foundations, and other sources must be deposited into the account. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2011 c 270 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2011 c 270: See note following RCW 28A.300.105.